Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1951.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:



Req. No. 3429 Page 1


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the


“Reproductive Empowerment and Support Through Optimal Restoration


(RESTORE) Act”.


B. The Legislature finds that:


1. There is a growing interest among women and men to


proactively assess their overall health and understand how factors,


such as their age and medical history, contribute to their


reproductive health and fertility;


2. Women and men are worthy of the highest standard of medical


care, including the opportunity to assess, understand, and improve


their reproductive health. Yet, many women and men do not receive


adequate information about their reproductive health nor have access


to restorative reproductive medicine;


3. Reproductive health conditions are the leading cause of


infertility, affecting eleven percent (11%) of women and nine


percent (9%) of men in the United States. Leading conditions


include endometriosis, polycystic ovary syndrome (PCOS), blocked


fallopian tubes, and male-factor infertility;


4. Research shows that male and female infertility is typically


due to four or more conditions or factors, with the diagnosis shared


equally between men and women;



Req. No. 3429 Page 2


5. There is a gap in research and care for reproductive health


conditions that affect a majority of women struggling with


“unexplained infertility”. Unexplained infertility accounts for


fifteen percent (15%) to thirty percent (30%) of all diagnoses of


infertility;


6. Restorative reproductive medicine aims to examine how


women’s reproductive functions and cycle interact with the rest of


the female body;


7. Male-factor infertility and reproductive dysfunction has


been on the rise since the 1970s, with a one-percent decrease in


sperm count, testosterone, and total fertility per year;


8. Restorative reproductive medicine can eliminate barriers to


successful conception, pregnancy, and birth. It can also address


some causes of recurrent miscarriages; and


9. Restorative reproductive medicine alleviates other difficult


symptoms associated with reproductive health conditions including,


but not limited to, painful periods, painful flare-ups, bloating,


inflammation, heavy periods, irregular periods, nerve pain, bowel


symptoms, pain during sexual intercourse, and back pain. It also


addresses common symptoms related to male-factor infertility,


including erectile dysfunction.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-559.2 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 3429 Page 3


As used in this act:


1. “Infertility” means a symptom of an underlying disease or


condition within a person’s body that makes it difficult or


impossible to successfully conceive and carry a live child to term


where it should otherwise be possible through intercourse with a


person of the other sex. A diagnosis of infertility often occurs


after twelve (12) months of targeted intercourse for women under


thirty-five (35) years of age, or after six (6) months of targeted


intercourse without the use of a chemical, barrier, or other


contraceptive method for women thirty-five (35) years of age and


older;


2. “Restorative reproductive medicine” (RRM) means any


scientific approach to reproductive medicine that seeks to cooperate


with or restore the normal physiology and anatomy of the human


reproductive system. It does not employ methods that are inherently


suppressive, circumventive, or destructive to the human body;


3. “Restorative reproductive health” (RRH) includes empowering


women and men to know and understand their bodies and appreciate the


importance of natural reproductive health to overall health and


well-being, including through the use of body literacy programs that


incorporate science-based charting methods, teacher-led reproductive


health education, restorative reproductive medicine, Natural


Procreative Technology (NaProTechnology), fertility awareness-based


methods, and fertility education and medical management;

Req. No. 3429 Page 4


4. “Assisted reproductive technology” means any treatments or


procedures that involve the handling of a human egg, sperm, and


embryo outside of the body with the intent of facilitating a


pregnancy, including artificial insemination, intrauterine


insemination, in vitro fertilization, gamete intrafallopian


fertilization, zygote intrafallopian fertilization, egg, embryo, and


sperm cryopreservation, and egg or embryo donation;


5. “Natural Procreative Technology” (NaProTechnology) means an


approach to health care that monitors and maintains a woman’s


reproductive and gynecological health, including laparoscopic


gynecologic surgery to reconstruct the uterus, fallopian tubes,


ovaries, and other organ structures to eliminate endometriosis and


other reproductive health conditions;


6. “Reproductive health conditions” includes endometriosis,


adenomyosis, polycystic ovary syndrome (PCOS), uterine fibroids,


blocked fallopian tubes, hormone imbalances, hyperprolactinemia,


thyroid conditions, ovulation dysfunctions, and other health


conditions that make it difficult or impossible to successfully


conceive a child where conception should otherwise be possible;


7. “Endometriosis” means a disease where tissue resembling


endometrial lining tissue grows outside of the uterus. The tissue


often sticks to different organs, disfiguring them, and, through


scar tissue or adhesions, can make the organs stick to one another


or to the pelvic walls. It has been found in the abdominal organs,

Req. No. 3429 Page 5


the bowel, the diaphragm, the lungs, the brain, and the eye. It is


a progressive disease and has been compared to cancer growth.


Endometriosis is often diagnosed in stages, with Stage I the mildest


form and Stage IV the most severe and widespread form. The average


diagnosis delay for endometriosis is ten (10) to twelve (12) years.


Endometriosis frequently goes undiagnosed, and women may suffer for


years with painful periods, pelvic pain, or infertility. The cause


of endometriosis is unknown;


8. “Adenomyosis” means a disease that occurs when endometrial


tissue (tissue that would normally line the inside of the uterus,


distinct from endometriosis tissue) grows down into the muscle layer


of the uterus. Adenomyosis is different from, but can exist


concurrently with, endometriosis. Adenomyosis may increase the risk


of miscarriage and preterm labor and may contribute to infertility.


The cause of adenomyosis is unknown;


9. “Polycystic ovary syndrome” (PCOS) means a reproductive


hormonal disorder that causes cysts to grow on the ovaries, usually


as a result of hormonal imbalances. Polycystic ovary syndrome


affects approximately fifteen percent (15%) of women overall but is


more common among women with infertility. It is more prevalent


among women with obesity and insulin resistance. Women with


polycystic ovary syndrome who are trying to achieve pregnancy are


commonly prescribed oral ovulation medication and hormonal


injections that stimulate ovulation. Accurate and timely diagnosis

Req. No. 3429 Page 6


and treatment can correct underlying hormonal imbalances, critical


for both long-term health improvements as well as for fertility


outcomes;


10. “Uterine fibroids” means muscular tumors that grow in the


wall of the uterus. While not all women experience symptoms


associated with fibroids, if the tumors are large enough or embedded


far enough in the uterine lining, they can lead to pain and heavy


bleeding. Treatment for fibroids may be a hysteroscopic myomectomy,


abdominal myomectomy, uterine fibroid embolization (UFE), or uterine


artery embolization (UAE). Uterine fibroids can increase risks of


preterm labor, pregnancy complications leading to a cesarean


section, and placental abruption, among other risks. The cause of


uterine fibroids is unknown;


11. “Blocked fallopian tubes” means a condition where the


fallopian tubes are blocked by tubal spasm, scarring from


inflammatory conditions, debris, tubal polyps, tubal ligation, prior


ectopic pregnancy, pelvic adhesions, endometriosis, or prior pelvic


infection (pelvic inflammatory disease or “PID”). Approximately one


in four women with infertility have a tubal blockage. This


condition makes achieving pregnancy difficult, if not impossible.


Treatments for a blockage include fallopian tube recanalization,


tubotubal anastomosis (tubal ligation reversal), and


neosalpingostomy/fimbrioplasty;



Req. No. 3429 Page 7


12. “Fertility awareness-based methods” (FABMs) means modern,


evidence-based methods of tracking the menstrual cycle through


observable biological signs in a woman, such as body temperature,


cervical fluid, and hormone production in the reproductive system,


including luteinizing hormone (LH) and estrogen. Such methods


include fertility education and medical management, the


symptothermal method, the Marquette method, the Creighton method,


and the Billings ovulation method; and


13. “Fertility education and medical management” (FEMM) means


the program developed in collaboration with the Reproductive Health


Research Institute for medical research, protocols, and medical


training for health care professionals in order to enable the


clinical application of important research advances in reproductive


endocrinology, by providing education for women about their bodies


and hormonal health and medical support, as appropriate.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-559.3 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Notwithstanding any other provision of law, nothing in this act


shall be construed to require hospitals, individuals, employees,


grantees, contractors, or entities to violate their consciences,


religious beliefs, or moral convictions by requiring them, or


holding them liable for refusing, to provide any health care


referenced in this act.

Req. No. 3429 Page 8


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-559.4 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Notwithstanding any other state law, a person or entity,


including a state or local government agency, that receives state


funds, including state-administered federal funds, or local


government funds shall not penalize, retaliate against, or otherwise


discriminate against a health care provider on the basis that the


health care provider does not, or declines to:


1. Assist in, receive training in, provide, perform, refer for,


pay for, or otherwise participate in assisted reproductive


technology; or


2. Facilitate or make arrangements for any of the activities


described in paragraph 1 of this subsection in a manner that


violates the health care provider’s sincerely held religious beliefs


or moral convictions.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-559.5 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The State Department of Health shall implement data


collection and produce a report every three (3) years on the


standard of care for women with infertility diagnoses.


B. In carrying out the data collection under subsection A of


this section, the Department shall:

Req. No. 3429 Page 9


1. Collect and assess data related to restorative reproductive


medicine prior to referral for or use of assisted reproductive


technology. Restorative reproductive medicine may include


ultrasounds, blood tests, hormone panels, laparoscopic and


exploratory surgeries, examining the woman’s overall health and


lifestyle, eliminating environmental endocrine disruptors, and


assessing her partner’s health and fertility;


2. Collect and assess data related to access to information and


training for fertility awareness-based methods; and


3. Assess group health plans or issuers of group or individual


health insurance coverage of the treatments, tests, and training


described in paragraphs 1 and 2 of this subsection.


C. In carrying out the data collection under subsection A of


this section, the Department shall ensure that the privacy and


confidentiality of individual patients are protected in a manner


consistent with relevant privacy and confidentiality laws.


D. No later than two (2) years after the date of enactment of


this act, the Department shall electronically submit the report to


the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of


Representatives, and the Governor, and make publicly available on


the website of the Department, a report on the data collection


carried out under this section.





Req. No. 3429 Page 10


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-559.6 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The State Department of Health shall implement data


collection and produce a report every three (3) years on the


standard of care for women and men seeking reproductive health


condition diagnoses.


B. In carrying out the data collection under subsection A of


this section, the Department shall:


1. Collect and assess data related to access to restorative


reproductive medicine and restorative reproductive health, including


access to medical professionals trained in Natural Procreative


Technology (NaProTechnology) and fertility education and medical


management;


2. Collect and assess data related to access to information and


training on fertility awareness-based methods; and


3. Assess group health plans or issuers of group or individual


health insurance coverage of the treatments, tests, and training


described in paragraphs 1 and 2 of this subsection.


C. In carrying out the data collection under subsection A of


this section, the Department shall ensure that the privacy and


confidentiality of individual patients are protected in a manner


consistent with relevant privacy and confidentiality laws.



Req. No. 3429 Page 11


D. No later than two (2) years after the date of enactment of


this act, the Department shall electronically submit the report to


the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of


Representatives, and the Governor, and make publicly available on


the website of the Department, a report on the data collection


carried out under this section.


SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-559.7 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. All Title X-funded facilities in this state shall include


fertility awareness-based methods as part of covered family planning


and reproductive health services.


B. 1. The State Department of Health shall work with Title X-


funded facilities to integrate fertility awareness-based methods


into existing programs within twelve (12) months of the effective


date of this act.


2. The Department shall provide guidance and support to


facilities in implementing the fertility awareness-based methods,


including:


a. training for health care providers on fertility


awareness-based methods, and


b. development of patient education materials on


fertility awareness-based methods.



Req. No. 3429 Page 12


C. Consistent with federal law, Title X-funded facilities shall


allocate a portion of existing Title X funds to cover implementing


and providing fertility awareness-based methods.


D. Compliance with this section shall be a condition of receipt


of Title X funds.


E. 1. The Department shall not exclude entities that provide


restorative reproductive medicine from receiving the grants and


contracts provided to other Title X entities, provided they meet all


other qualifications.


2. The Department shall not exclude entities that provide


training and education for medical students and professionals in


restorative reproductive medicine from receiving the grants and


contracts provided to other Title X entities, provided they meet all


other qualifications.


SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-559.8 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The State Department of Health shall develop within the


already existing state health education standards and public health


program curricula to include information on reproductive health


conditions, restorative reproductive medicine, restorative


reproductive health, and fertility awareness-based methods. Public


health programs include:


1. Family planning services;

Req. No. 3429 Page 13


2. Maternal and child health programs; and


3. Women’s health initiatives.


B. No later than eighteen (18) months after the date of


enactment of this act, the Department shall make publicly available


a report on the updated curriculum standards for public health


programs and a plan for regular reporting on their outcomes.


C. The Department shall ensure that any grant or partnership


opportunities within these programs are advertised to and inclusive


of organizations that specialize in restorative reproductive health


and fertility awareness education.


SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-559.9 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The State Department of Health shall work with health care


professional licensure boards to update professional education and


licensing requirements as needed to include training in restorative


reproductive medicine, restorative reproductive health, and


fertility awareness-based methods through the management of their


health care license.


B. The Department shall provide training to staff working at


Title X providers on reproductive health conditions, restorative


reproductive medicine, restorative reproductive health, and


fertility awareness-based methods.



Req. No. 3429 Page 14


C. This training may include restorative reproductive medicine


(RRM), fertility education and medical management (FEMM), and


fertility awareness-based methods (FABMs) toolkits, peer learning


opportunities, Natural Procreative Technology (NaProTechnology)


educational fellowships, FEMM and FABMs education, short videos on


reproductive health conditions and RRM, and contracts with medical


professionals for seminars and training on RRM, NaProTechnology,


FEMM, and FABMs.


SECTION 10. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-559.10 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The State Department of Health shall expand and coordinate


programs to conduct and support research on reproductive health


conditions.


B. The Department shall implement this research initiative in


coordination with any other agency or research university already


conducting research on reproductive health conditions, infertility,


and maternal health.


C. In carrying out the research under subsection A of this


section, the Department may direct research on:


1. The causes of reproductive health conditions, especially


endometriosis, adenomyosis, uterine fibroids, and polycystic ovary


syndrome (PCOS);


2. Ways to diagnose reproductive health conditions;

Req. No. 3429 Page 15


3. Restorative reproductive medicine and new treatment options


for reproductive health conditions;


4. Endocrine-disrupting chemicals in endometriosis, the


relationship of endometriosis and cancer, and prenatal and


epigenetic influences on the risk for endometriosis;


5. The growth and progression of reproductive health conditions


and recurrence post-surgical procedures;


6. Male mechanisms of infertility, such as low sperm count, low


sperm motility, erectile dysfunction, low testosterone, varicocele,


and testicular torsion;


7. The effectiveness of fertility awareness-based methods to


achieve pregnancy and increase the number of live births;


8. Premenstrual syndrome (PMS), hormonal dysfunctions,


ovulation defects, abnormal uterine bleeding, adhesion prevention,


tubal corrective surgery, and preconception health;


9. The prevalence of sexually transmitted infections (STIs) and


their effects on fertility in both men and women; and


10. The impact of exposure to environmental factors like per-


and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) and microplastics on male and


female reproductive health, including sperm quality.


D. No later than twenty-four (24) months after the effective


date of this act, the Department shall make a report on the research


publicly available. This report shall be updated annually.



Req. No. 3429 Page 16


SECTION 11. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-559.11 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The State Department of Health shall expand and coordinate


programs, within existing public health or family planning


initiatives, for the development of education, awareness, and


treatment for male-factor infertility through lifestyle and


metabolic modifications.


B. This new integration includes, but is not limited to, low


sperm count, motility, morphology, hormonal imbalances, sexually


transmitted infections (STIs), obesity, varicoceles, and erectile


dysfunction.


C. No later than twenty-four (24) months after the effective


date of this act, the Department shall make a report on the research


publicly available, along with the developed plans for education and


treatment for male factor infertility within the existing state


public health and family planning programs. This report shall be


updated annually.


SECTION 12. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-559.12 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The State Department of Health shall collaborate with local,


state, and federal policymakers to recommend updated diagnostic and


procedural codes related to infertility treatments to reflect the

Req. No. 3429 Page 17


latest knowledge and practices in restorative reproductive medicine,


including recommending a thorough federal review of the


International Classification of Diseases, 10th Revision, Clinical


Modification (ICD-10-CM), the International Classification of


Diseases, 10th Revision, Procedure Coding System (ICD-10-PCS), the


Current Procedural Terminology (CPT) code set, and the Healthcare


Common Procedure Coding System (HCPCS). Codes should be revised and


developed for:


1. Endometriosis, polycystic ovary syndrome (PCOS), uterine


fibroids, adenomyosis, blocked fallopian tubes, and male mechanisms


of infertility to ensure accurate classification of severe, chronic


reproductive health conditions requiring medical or surgical


intervention;


2. Laparoscopic excision, hysteroscopic procedures, and other


minimally invasive surgeries aimed at addressing such conditions,


including the excision of fibroids, ovarian cysts, and adenomyosis-


related tissue removal;


3. Minimally invasive surgeries and other interventions that


target infertility-related conditions, specifically including


laparoscopic excision, differentiation between laparoscopic ablation


and laparoscopic excision of endometriosis, appendectomy related to


endometriosis, bowel resection related to endometriosis,


hysteroscopic myomectomy, abdominal myomectomy, cystectomy, other


minimally invasive procedures that directly treat underlying

Req. No. 3429 Page 18


reproductive health conditions, and for family planning services,


specifically including female cycle charting instruction; and


4. Ensuring appropriate reimbursement under the Medicare and


Medicaid programs for reproductive health-related surgical


procedures, postoperative care, and family planning services,


specifically including female cycle charting instruction.


SECTION 13. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-559.13 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


If any provision of this act, or the application of such


provision to any person, entity, government, or circumstance, is


held to be unconstitutional, the remainder of this act, or the


application of such provision to all other persons, entities,


governments, or circumstances, shall not be affected thereby.


SECTION 14. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3429 DC 1/15/2026 9:09:24 AM















Req. No. 3429 Page 19